Utah statutes.
31A-13-105.   Reports to employers and employees.
(1)  The fund or plan's annual report, and any other statement the
commissioner indicates, shall be kept on file with the commissioner and at the
principal office of the trustees.
(2)  The statements, or the portion of the statements the commissioner
considers appropriate, shall be made available by the commissioner or by the
trustees, or both, for inspection:
(a)  by an employer contributing to the fund;
(b)  by a labor organization which is a party to an agreement establishing the
fund; or
(c)  by an employee covered by the fund.
(3)  When the commissioner considers it to be in the public interest, he may
require the trustees to mail any portions of the statements which the
commissioner considers appropriate:
(a)  to employees covered by the fund;
(b)  to contributing employers; or
(c)  to any labor organization which is a party to an agreement establishing
the fund.
